Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 458.390 is amended to read:
458.390. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall  implement a long-term
rental assistance program that  is available to individuals who are younger than 25 years of age and
who are, or have recently been:
(a) Homeless;
(b) In [ any] a substitute care program, as defined in ORS 326.575;
[(c) Incarcerated or detained in a correctional facility or detention facility as  defined in ORS
419A.004; or]
(c) Residing in a child care center, as defined in ORS 419A.004;
(d) Confined in a correctional facility, as defined in ORS 341.522; or
[(d)] (e)  Residing in a facility for dependency treatment or rehabilitation or for  mental health
treatment.
(2) The department shall choose three or four regions in which to operate the  program, which
must include at least one urban area, one rural area and one coastal area.
(3) In designing the program, the department shall consult with:
(a) The Oregon Housing Stability Council;
(b) The Department of Human Services, including department staff operating programs or ser-
vices for eligible foster children or former foster children and the  department’s advisory committee
on runaway and homeless youth under ORS 417.799 (6);
(c) Housing authorities;
(d) Community-based social service providers serving the population of  eligible recipients of the
program;
(e) Culturally specific youth providers; [ and]
(f) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon[ .]; and
(g) The Oregon Youth Authority.
(4) The Housing and Community Services Department shall collect data on  program participants
receiving rental assistance, including:
(a) Demographic data, including race.
(b) Program subsidy amounts.
(c) Length of tenancies and instances of rehousing or homelessness.
Enrolled Senate Bill 814 (SB 814-A) Page 1
(d) Types of housing, including roommates or family living situations.
(e) Access to, and utilization of, other support systems,  including education, workforce training,
health insurance and primary care providers.
(5) The department may contract with housing authorities,  community action agencies or
community-based social service and housing providers to deliver rental  assistance and to collect and
report data under the program.
Passed by Senate March 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 814 (SB 814-A) Page 2